Utah statutes.
19-8-116.   Reservation of applicant's and department's causes of action.

(1)  This chapter does not release, discharge, or in any way affect any claims, causes of action, or demands in law or equity the applicant or the department may have against any person not a party to the agreement, for any liability it may have arising out of or relating in any way to the generation, storage, treatment, handling, transportation, release, or disposal of any contaminants, including transportation to or from the site covered by the agreement.

(2)  Subject to Section 19-8-119, this chapter does not affect the applicant's right to seek contribution, indemnity, or any other available remedy against any party other than the department who is responsible or liable for contribution, indemnity, or otherwise for any amounts which have been or will be expended by the applicant in connection with the site.



Amended by Chapter 200, 2005 General Session

